Utah statutes.
63M-1-2602.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Affected department" means, as applicable, the Board of Education or the Department of Technology Services.

(2)  "Board" means the Board of Business and Economic Development created under Section 63M-1-301.

(3)  "Board of Education" means the Utah State Board of Education.

(4)  "Chief procurement officer" means the chief procurement officer appointed under Section 63G-6-203.

(5)  "Committee" means the proposal review committee created under Section 63M-1-2604.

(6)  "Day" means a calendar day.

(7)  "Director" is as defined in Section 63M-1-102.

(8)  "Executive Appropriations Committee" means the Legislature's Executive Appropriations Committee.

(9)  "Information technology" is as defined in Section 63F-1-102.

(10)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development created under Section 63M-1-201.

(11)  "Private entity" means a person submitting a proposal under this part for the purpose of entering into a project.

(12)  "Project" means the subject of a proposal or an agreement for the procurement or disposal of:

(a)  information technology or telecommunications products or services; or

(b)  supplies or services for or on behalf of the Department of Technology Services or the Board of Education.

(13)  "Proposal" means an unsolicited offer by a private entity to undertake a project, including an initial proposal under Section 63M-1-2605 and a detailed proposal under Section 63M-1-2608.

(14)  "Services" is as defined in Section 63G-6-103.

(15)  "Supplies" is as defined in Section 63G-6-103.

(16)  "Telecommunications" is as defined in Section 63F-1-102.

